test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-birkov_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - birkov: # Noun 224 'eng /est perkapund/fin' - full paradigm
     birkov+N+Sg+Nom: birkov
     birkov+N+Sg+Gen: birkov
     birkov+N+Sg+Par: birkovt
     birkov+N+Sg+Dat: birkovn
     birkov+N+Sg+Ins: birkovks
     birkov+N+Sg+Ill: birkovõ
     birkov+N+Sg+Ela: birkovst
     birkov+N+Pl+Nom: birkovd
     birkov+N+Pl+Gen: birkovd
     birkov+N+Pl+Par: birkovḑi
     birkov+N+Pl+Dat: birkovdõn
     birkov+N+Pl+Ins: birkovdkõks
     birkov+N+Pl+Ill: birkovži
     birkov+N+Pl+Ela: birkovšti
